Oklahoma, session 2026, SB101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.901 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “State median income” means the amount determined by the


United States Department of Housing and Urban Development to be the


estimated median income of this state for the year preceding the


corresponding tax year; and


2. “Taxpayer” means an individual taxpayer or married taxpayers


filing jointly that are residents of this state.


B. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68

Req. No. 1122 Page 1


of the Oklahoma Statutes equal to the rent paid or the mortgage


principal and interest paid on the primary residence, located within


this state, of an individual taxpayer whose gross household income


does not exceed the limits provided in paragraphs 7 and 8 of


subsection C of this section.


C. The credit allowed pursuant to this section shall not exceed


the following amounts:


1. Seven Thousand Dollars ($7,000.00) for a taxpayer claiming


two or more dependents whose gross household income from all sources


does not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the state median income;


2. Seven Thousand Dollars ($7,000.00) for a taxpayer claiming


less than two dependents whose gross household income from all


sources does not exceed ten percent (10%) of the state median


income;


3. Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for a taxpayer claiming


two or more dependents whose gross household income from all sources


does not exceed forty percent (40%) of the state median income;


4. Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for a taxpayer claiming


less than two dependents whose gross household income from all


sources does not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the state median


income;


5. Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) for a taxpayer claiming


two or more dependents whose gross household income from all sources


does not exceed sixty percent (60%) of the state median income;

Req. No. 1122 Page 2


6. Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) for a taxpayer claiming


less than two dependents whose gross household income from all


sources does not exceed forty percent (40%) of the state median


income;


7. One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for a taxpayer claiming two


or more dependents whose gross household income from all sources


does not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the state median income; and


8. One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for a taxpayer claiming


less than two dependents whose gross household income from all


sources does not exceed sixty percent (60%) of the state median


income.


D. No more than one credit shall be claimed per residence in


any tax year.


E. If the credit exceeds the tax imposed by Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the excess amount shall be


refunded to the taxpayer.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1122 QD 12/20/2024 6:54:28 PM











Req. No. 1122 Page 3